en: Batting helmet accessories included: Chin strap; Decal kit; Face mask; Jaw guard; Padding fit kit; Other
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมหมวกเบสบอลที่รวมอยู่ในชุด: สายรัดคาง; ชุดสติกเกอร์; หน้ากาก; ที่ป้องกันกราม; ชุดแผ่นรองปรับกระชับ; อื่นๆ
fr: Accessoires inclus avec le casque de frappeur: Mentonnière; Kit d'autocollants; Masque facial; Protège-mâchoire; Kit d'ajustement du rembourrage; Autre
de: Enthaltenes Zubehör für Schlaghelme: Kinnriemen; Aufkleber-Set; Gesichtsmaske; Kieferschutz; Polster-Anpassungsset; Sonstige
nl: Slaghelm meegeleverde accessoires: Kinband; Stickerset; Gezichtsmasker; Kaakbeschermer; Voeringset; Overig
ru: Аксессуары для бейсбольного шлема в комплекте.: Ремешок для подбородка; Набор наклеек; Лицевая маска; Защита челюсти; Набор подкладок для подгонки; Другое
tr: Vuruş kaskı dahil aksesuarlar: Çene kayışı; Çıkartma kiti; Yüz maskesi; Çene koruyucu; Uyum sağlayan dolgu kiti; Diğer
ko: 타격용 헬멧 포함 액세서리: 턱 끈; 데칼 키트; 안면 마스크; 조 가드; 패딩 핏 키트; 기타
fi: Sisältyvät lyöjän kypärän lisävarusteet: Leukahihna; Tarrasarja; Kasvosuoja; Leukasuoja; Pehmusteen sovitussarja; Muu
pt-BR: Acessórios para capacete de batedor incluídos: Tira de queixo; Kit de decalque; Máscara facial; Protetor de maxilar; Kit de ajuste de forro; Outros
pl: Akcesoria do kasku baseballowego w zestawie: Pasek podbródkowy; Zestaw naklejek; Maska; Ochrona szczęki; Zestaw dopasowujący wypełnienie; Inne
lt-LT: Įtraukti mušimo šalmo aksesuarų daiktai: Smakro dirželis; Lipdukų rinkinys; Veido kaukė; Žandikaulio apsauga; Paminkštinimo pritaikymo rinkinys; Kita
sl-SI: Priloženi dodatki za zaščitno čelado za odbijanje: Podbradni trak; Komplet nalepk; Maska za obraz; Ščitnik za čeljust; Komplet za prilagoditev oblazinjenja; Drugo
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари към каската за батиране: Подбрадник; Комплект стикери; Маска за лице; Предпазител за челюст; Комплект за регулиране на подплънките; Друго
zh-TW: 包含打擊頭盔配件: 下巴帶; 貼紙套件; 面罩; 護顎; 緩衝墊調整套件; 其他
nb: Tilbehør til slaghjelm inkludert: Hakestropp; Dekalsett; Ansiktsmaske; Kjevebeskytter; Tilpasningssett for polstring; Annet
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci za kacigu za bejzbol: Remen za bradu; Komplet naljepnica; Maska za lice; Štitnik za čeljust; Komplet uložaka za prilagodbu; Ostalo
it: Accessori per casco da battitore inclusi: Sottogola; Kit di adesivi; Maschera protettiva; Protezione per mascella; Kit di adattamento imbottitura; Altro
sk-SK: Príslušenstvo na tlmiacu prilbu je súčasťou balenia: Remienok pod bradu; Súprava nálepiek; Maska na tvár; Chránič čeľuste; Súprava na prispôsobenie výplne; Iné
sv: Tillbehör för slaghjälm ingår: Hakrem; Dekalsats; Ansiktsmask; Käkskydd; Passformskit med vaddering; Övrigt
vi: Phụ kiện mũ bảo hiểm đánh bóng đi kèm: Dây đeo cằm; Bộ decal; Mặt nạ; Miếng bảo vệ hàm; Bộ mút đệm điều chỉnh kích cỡ; Khác
hu: Ütősisak-tartozékok mellékelve: Állpánt; Matricakészlet; Arcmaszk; Állkapocsvédő; Párnázatkészlet; Egyéb
ja: バッティングヘルメットアクセサリー付き: あご紐; デカールキット; フェイスマスク; ジョーガード; フィット調整パッドキット; その他
da: Tilbehør til batting-hjelm inkluderet: Hagerem; Mærkatsæt; Ansigtsmaske; Kæbebeskytter; Polstringssæt til tilpasning; Andet
zh-CN: 包括头盔配件: 下巴带; 贴花套件; 面罩; 护颚; 调节垫套件; 其他
es: Accesorios para casco de bateo incluidos: Correa para la barbilla; Kit de calcomanías; Máscara facial; Protector de mandíbula; Kit de ajuste de relleno; Otro
cs: Dodávané příslušenství k baseballové / pálkařské helmě: Pásek pod bradu; Sada nálepek; Obličejová maska; Chránič čelisti; Sada na přizpůsobení polstrování; Jiné
pt-PT: Acessórios para capacete de batedor incluídos: Fita para o queixo; Kit de autocolantes; Máscara facial; Proteção de maxilar; Kit de ajuste de enchimento; Outro
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αξεσουάρ κράνους κρούσης: Λουράκι πηγουνιού; Κιτ αυτοκόλλητων; Μάσκα προσώπου; Προστατευτικό σαγονιού; Κιτ προσαρμογής επένδυσης; Άλλο
ro-RO: Accesorii incluse pentru casca batterului: Curea pentru bărbie; Set de abțibilduri; Mască de protecție; Protecție pentru maxilar; Set de pernuțe pentru ajustare; Altele